fst/karelian.twol
! Two-level morphophonology rules for Karelian noun consonant gradation.
! Demonstrates the classic Finnic "strong grade / weak grade" alternation:
!   {GK}  kk ~ k     (gemination reduction, e.g. akka ~ akan)
!   {GP}  p  ~ v      (lenition, e.g. arpa ~ arvan)
!   {GD}  k  ~ 0      (full deletion, e.g. alku ~ alun)
!
! Strong grade appears in the open syllable of the bare nominative (word-final).
! Weak grade appears when the genitive suffix -n closes the syllable.

Alphabet
  a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z
  ä ö š č ž
  %{GK%}:kk %{GK%}:k
  %{GP%}:p  %{GP%}:v
  %{GD%}:k  %{GD%}:0
;

Rules

"GK strong grade (word-final nominative)"
%{GK%}:kk <=> _ a .#. ;

"GK weak grade (before genitive -n)"
%{GK%}:k <=> _ a n .#. ;

"GP strong grade (word-final nominative)"
%{GP%}:p <=> _ a .#. ;

"GP weak grade (before genitive -n)"
%{GP%}:v <=> _ a n .#. ;

"GD strong grade (word-final nominative, u-stem)"
%{GD%}:k <=> _ u .#. ;

"GD strong grade (word-final nominative, a-stem)"
%{GD%}:k <=> _ a .#. ;

"GD weak grade / deleted (before genitive -n, u-stem)"
%{GD%}:0 <=> _ u n .#. ;

"GD weak grade / deleted (before genitive -n, a-stem)"
%{GD%}:0 <=> _ a n .#. ;
